nouns.pl.che.lexd
LEXICON NounPl
абажур:абажур[a_epent]
абазо:абазо[fourth_type]
абзац:абзац[a_epent]
абиссинец:абиссинк[a_epent]
абиссинка:абиссинк[a_epent]
абонемент:абонемент[a_epent]
абонент:абонент[a_epent]
аборт:аборт[a_epent]
абстракци:абстракце
абхазец:абхазц[a_epent]
абхазка:абхазк[a_epent]
аванс:аванс[a_epent]
авантюра:авантюр[a_epent]
авантюрист:авантюрист[a_epent]
авари:аваре
авгол:авгол[a_epent]
авиатор:авиатор
аврал:аврал[a_epent]
авсал:авсал
авст:авст[a_epent]
австралиец:австралийц[a_epent]
австралийка:австралийк[a_epent]
австриец:австрийц[a_epent]
австрийка:австрийк[a_epent]
автобус:автобус[a_epent]
автомат:автомат[a_epent]
автоматчик:автоматчик[a_epent]
автомобиль:автомобил[a_epent]
автор:автор
агент:агент[a_epent]
агентство:агентство
агитатор:агитатор
агрегат:агрегат[a_epent]
агрессор:агрессор
агроном:агроном[a_epent]
адам:адам[a_epent]
адвокат:адвокат[a_epent]
аджарец:аджарц[a_epent]
аджарка:аджарк[a_epent]
адмирал:адмирал[a_epent]
адрес:адрес[a_epent]
адъютант:адъютант[a_epent]
адыгеец:адыгейц[a_epent]
адыгейка:адыгейк[a_epent]
азербайджанец:азербайджанц[a_epent]
азербайджанка:азербайджанк[a_epent]
айам:айам[a_epent]
aйгӀap:айгӀар
айкх:айкх[a_epent]
айла:айлан[a_epent]
айма:айман[a_epent]
айп:айп[a_epent]
айр:айр[a_epent]
академи:академе
акаци:акаце
акварель:акварел[a_epent]
аквариум:аквариум[a_epent]
аккорд:аккорд[a_epent]
аккордеон:аккордеон[a_epent]
акт:акт[a_epent]
актeр:актeр[a_epent]
актив:актив[a_epent]
активист:активист[a_epent]
активистка:активистк[a_epent]
актриса:актрис[a_epent]
акула:акул[a_epent]
акушeр:акушeр[a_epent]
акушерка:акушерк[a_epent]
акци:акце
акционер:акционер[a_epent]
акхшо:акхшо[fourth_type]
албанец:албанц[a_epent]
албанка:албанк[a_epent]
алкоголик:алкоголик[a_epent]
алкханч:алкханч[a_epent]
аллей:аллей
ялх:ялхо[fourth_type]
алфавит:алфавит[a_epent]
альбом:альбом[a_epent]
альманах:альманах[a_epent]
альпинист:альпинист[a_epent]
альпинистка:альпинистк[a_epent]
амалт:амалт[a_epent]
амбар:амбар[a_epent]
амбулатори:амбулаторе
американец:американц[a_epent]
американка:американк[a_epent]
амнисти:амнисте
амфибрахи:амфибрахе
ан:ан[a_epent]
анализ:анализ[a_epent]
ананас:ананас[a_epent]
анапест:анапест[a_epent]
ангали:ангале
англичанин:англичан[a_epent]
англичанка:англичанк[a_epent]
анкета:анкет[a_epent]
ансамбль:ансамбл[a_epent]
ант:ант[a_epent]
антенна:антенн[a_epent]
антоним:антоним[a_epent]
антракт:антракт[a_epent]
антрополог:антрополог[a_epent]
апельсин:апельсин[a_epent]
аппарат:аппарат[a_epent]
аппендицит:аппендицит[a_epent]
аппетит:аппетит[a_epent]
аптека:аптек[a_epent]
аптечка:аптечк[a_epent]
арбитр:арбитр[a_epent]
арбитраж:арбитраж[a_epent]
арван:арван[a_epent]
арданг:арданг[a_epent]
арз:аьрзн[a_epent]
ари:ари
аристократ:аристократ[a_epent]
аркхо:аркхон[a_epent]
арс:аьрсн[a_epent]
артель:артел[a_epent]
артист:артист[a_epent]
артистка:артистк[a_epent]
археолог:археолог[a_epent]
архив:архив[a_epent]
архипелаг:архипелаг[a_epent]
архитектор:архитектор
аса:асан[a_epent]
асар:асар
аспирант:аспирант[a_epent]
аспирантура:аспирантур[a_epent]
ассамблей:ассамблей
ассистент:ассистент[a_epent]
ассистентка:ассистентк[a_epent]
ассоциаци:ассоциаце
астроном:астроном[a_epent]
атака:атак[a_epent]
атлан:атлан[a_epent]
атлас:атлас[a_epent]
атом:атом[a_epent]
аттестат:аттестат[a_epent]
аудитори:аудиторе
аукцион:аукцион[a_epent]
афганец:афганц[a_epent]
афганка:афганк[a_epent]
аферист:аферист[a_epent]
аферистка:аферистк[a_epent]
африканец:африканц[a_epent]
африканка:африканк[a_epent]
ахк:ахк[a_epent]
ахкарг:ахкарг[a_epent]
ахча:ахчан[a_epent]
аьккхи:аьккхи[fourth_type]
аьлха:аьлхан[a_epent]
аьлча:аьлчан[a_epent]
аьнгалха:аьнгалх[a_epent]
аьрзу:
аьрша:аьршан[a_epent]
аьста:аьстан[a_epent]
аьтто:аьттон[a_epent]
аьхке:аьхкен[a_epent]
аьшкал:аьшкал
багаж:багаж[a_epent]
бад:д[a_epent]
базис:базис[a_epent]
байка:байкан[a_epent]
баймакх:баймакх[a_epent]
байракх:байракх[a_epent]
байт:байт[a_epent]
бак:бак[a_epent]
баккхал:баккхал
баккхалхо:баккхалхо[fourth_type]
баклажан:баклажан[a_epent]
бактери:бактере
бакъе:бакъен[a_epent]
бакъо:бакъон[a_epent]
бал:баьлн[a_epent]
баланс:баланс[a_epent]
балба:балбан[a_epent]
балг:балг[a_epent]
балда:балд[a_epent]
балерина:балерин[a_epent]
балет:балет[a_epent]
балкон:балкон[a_epent]
балкхаро:балкхаро[fourth_type]
баллада:баллад[a_epent]
балласт:балласт[a_epent]
баллон:баллон[a_epent]
бамба:бамбан[a_epent]
банан:банан[a_epent]
банда:бандан[a_epent]
банк:банк[a_epent]
банка:банкан[a_epent]
банкет:банкет[a_epent]
банкир:банкир[a_epent]
банкрот:банкрот[a_epent]
баппа:бапп[a_epent]
барак:барак[a_epent]
барам:рам[a_epent]
баргал:баргал
баргол:баргол[a_epent]
барз:баьрзн[a_epent]
барзакъ:барзакъ[a_epent]
барин:барин[a_epent]
баритон:баритон[a_epent]
баркалла:баркалл[a_epent]
барни:барне
барометр:барометр[a_epent]
баррикада:баррикад[a_epent]
бартхо:бартхо[fourth_type]
бархӀанча:бархӀанч[a_epent]
барч:баьрчн[a_epent]
басе:басен[a_epent]
басма:басме
басни:басне
бат:бато
батальон:батальон[a_epent]
батарей:батарей
батист:батист[a_epent]
баттам:баттам[a_epent]
бахтар:бахтар
бахьана:бахьан[a_epent]
бацилла:бацилл[a_epent]
башкир:башкир[a_epent]
башкирка:башкирк[a_epent]
башлакх:башлакх[a_epent]
башлам:башлаьмн[a_epent]
башмакх:башмакх[a_epent]
баӀ:баьӀ[a_epent]
баӀар:баӀар
баьлча:баьлчан[a_epent]
баьхьа:баьхьан[a_epent]
баьчча:баьччан[a_epent]
беда:бедан[a_epent]
бедар:бедар
бежана:бежан[a_epent]
без:без[a_epent]
бекх:бекх[a_epent]
бел:бел[a_epent]
белорус:белорус[a_epent]
белоруска:белоруск[a_epent]
белхазхо:белхазхо[fourth_type]
белхало:белхало[fourth_type]
белхахо:белхахо[fourth_type]
белхи:белхе
белхьам:белхьам[a_epent]
белш:белш[a_epent]
бен:бен[a_epent]
бер:бер[a_epent]
бера:беран[a_epent]
берд:берд[a_epent]
берданка:берданк[a_epent]
беркат:беркат[a_epent]
бертиг:бертиг[a_epent]
берч:берч[a_epent]
бесни:бесне
бехк:бехк[a_epent]
бехказло:бехказлон[a_epent]
библиотека:библиотек[a_epent]
билгало:билгалон[a_epent]
билет:билет[a_epent]
билзиг:билзиг[a_epent]
бинт:бинт[a_epent]
биографи:биографе
бираьнчиг:бираьнчиг[a_epent]
биргӀа:биргӀан[a_epent]
биссектриса:биссектрис[a_epent]
биток:биток[a_epent]
биши:бише
биъсаберг:биъсаберг[a_epent]
блок:блок[a_epent]
блокнот:блокнот[a_epent]
бог:боьгн[a_epent]
бод:бед[a_epent]
божал:божал
боз:боьз[a_epent]
бозбуунча:бозбуунч[a_epent]
бой:бойн[a_epent]
бокх:боькхн[a_epent]
бол:бел[a_epent]
болх:белх[a_epent]
больница:больниц[a_epent]
большевик:большевик[a_epent]
бомба:бомбан[a_epent]
боргӀал:боргӀал
борец:борец[a_epent]
борт:борт[a_epent]
борц:берц[a_epent]
боршам:боршам[a_epent]
борщ:борщ[a_epent]
бос:бесн[a_epent]
босбуург:босбуург[a_epent]
ботаник:ботаник[a_epent]
ботинок:ботинк[a_epent]
бохча:бохчан[a_epent]
бохь:баххь[a_epent]
бочка:бочкан[a_epent]
бошто:боштон[a_epent]
бошхап:бошхап[a_epent]
боьлла:боьлл[a_epent]
брак:брак[a_epent]
браковщик:браковщик[a_epent]
браковщица:браковщиц[a_epent]
браунинг:браунинг[a_epent]
брезент:брезент[a_epent]
бригада:бригад[a_epent]
бригадир:бригадир[a_epent]
броневик:броневик[a_epent]
брошюра:брошюр[a_epent]
бугӀа:бугӀан[a_epent]
буй:буйн[a_epent]
букварь:буквар[a_epent]
букет:букет[a_epent]
букъ:баккъ[a_epent]
була:булан[a_epent]
булавка:булавк[a_epent]
булка:булкан[a_epent]
бульвар:бульвар[a_epent]
бумаьштиг:бумаьштиг[a_epent]
бумбари:бумбаре
бумзи:бумзе
бун:банн[a_epent]
бунт:буьнт[a_epent]
буппӀаз:буппӀаз[a_epent]
бурак:бурак[a_epent]
буракъ:буракъ[a_epent]
бурам:бурам[a_epent]
бурамхо:бурамхо[fourth_type]
буржал:буржал
буржуй:буржуй
бурса:бурсан[a_epent]
буру:буру
бурч:бурч[a_epent]
бустам:бустам[a_epent]
бута:бутан[a_epent]
буто:лаг[a_epent]
буфет:буфет[a_epent]
буфетчик:буфетчик[a_epent]
буфетчица:буфетчиц[a_epent]
бух:бахх[a_epent]
бухгалтер:бухгалтер
бухка:бухкар
бухӀа:бухӀан[a_epent]
буц:буц[a_epent]
буьйдиг:боьдг[a_epent]
буьйр:буьйр[a_epent]
буьйра:буьйран[a_epent]
буьйса:буьйсан[a_epent]
буька:буькан[a_epent]
буьнжо:лаг[a_epent]
буьрка:буьркан[a_epent]
буьртиг:буьртиг[a_epent]
буьччалг:буьччалг[a_epent]
былина:былин[a_epent]
бюджет:бюджет[a_epent]
бюллетень:бюллетен[a_epent]
бюрократ:бюрократ[a_epent]
бӀа:бӀар[a_epent]
бӀал:бӀаьлл[a_epent]
бӀар:бӀаьр[a_epent]
бӀарза:бӀаьрзан[a_epent]
бӀарлагӀа:бӀарлагӀан[a_epent]
бӀахо:бӀахо[fourth_type]
бӀаьлланг:бӀаьлланг[a_epent]
бӀаьрг:бӀаьрг[a_epent]
бӀаьрмециг:бӀаьрмециг[a_epent]
бӀаьсте:бӀаьстен[a_epent]
бӀаьца:бӀаьц[a_epent]
бӀаьштиг:бӀаьштиг[a_epent]
бӀе:бӀаьлг[a_epent]
бӀиж:бӀиж[a_epent]
бӀo:бӀо
бӀоба:бӀобан[a_epent]
бӀов:бӀаьвн[a_epent]
бӀо:гӀам[a_epent]
бӀоржам:бӀоржам[a_epent]
бӀоста:бӀостан[a_epent]
бӀотӀа:бӀотӀан[a_epent]
вагон:вагон[a_epent]
вагонетка:вагонетк[a_epent]
ваз:ваьзн[a_epent]
ваза:ваз[a_epent]
вазелин:вазелин[a_epent]
вал:ваьлн[a_epent]
валти:валте
вальс:вальс[a_epent]
валюта:валют[a_epent]
ванда:вандан[a_epent]
ванна:ванн[a_epent]
варвар:варвар
варе:варе
варени:ваpeне
варзап:варзап[a_epent]
варкхал:варкхал
варкъ:варкъ[a_epent]
варш:вapш[a_epent]
вас:вас[a_epent]
васт:васт[a_epent]
васхал:васхал
вахта:вахтан[a_epent]
вахтeр:вахтeр[a_epent]
ваӀда:ваӀдан[a_epent]
ваьппи:ваьппи[fourth_type]
вед:ведн[a_epent]
векал:векал
велосипед:велосипед[a_epent]
веназ:веназ[a_epent]
венгр:венгр[a_epent]
верстак:верстак[a_epent]
вeрстка:вeрсткан[a_epent]
верта:вертан[a_epent]
вершок:вершок[a_epent]
весет:весет[a_epent]
вескет:вескет[a_epent]
весовщик:весовщик[a_epent]
весовщица:весовщиц[a_epent]
вета:ветан[a_epent]
ветчалг:ветчалг[a_epent]
вечер:вечер
взвод:взвод[a_epent]
вид:вид[a_epent]
винт:винт[a_epent]
вир:варр[a_epent]
вирд:вирд[a_epent]
вклад:вклад[a_epent]
вкладчик:вкладчик[a_epent]
вкладчица:вкладчиц[a_epent]
вовхатар:вовхатар
водолаз:водолаз[a_epent]
военком:военком[a_epent]
вожати:вожате[fourth_type]
вокзал:вокзал[a_epent]
воккхаха:воккхах[a_epent]
ворда:вордан[a_epent]
ворот:ворот[a_epent]
ворта:вортан[a_epent]
вота:вотан[a_epent]
вотанча:вотанч[a_epent]
воттана:воттан[a_epent]
втуз:втуз[a_epent]
вуз:вуз[a_epent]
вулкан:вулкан[a_epent]
выговор:выговор
вымпел:вымпел
выставка:выставк[a_epent]
вышка:вышкан[a_epent]
га:гар[a_epent]
газ:газ[a_epent]
газет:газет[a_epent]
газопровод:газопровод[a_epent]
гай:гай
гайка:гайкан[a_epent]
гайшиг:гайшиг[a_epent]
галерей:галерей
галстук:галстук[a_epent]
галц:галц[a_epent]
гараж:гараж[a_epent]
гарза:гарзан[a_epent]
гарнизон:гарнизон[a_epent]
гарс:гарс[a_epent]
гастроль:гастрол[a_epent]
гата:гатан[a_epent]
гaxӀap:гахӀар
гаъ:гаьън[a_epent]
гаьззу:гаьззун[a_epent]
гаьзло:гаьзло[fourth_type]
гаьнгали:гаьнгале
гвардеец:гвардейц[a_epent]
гварди:гварде
ге:ген[a_epent]
гезг:гезг[a_epent]
гезгмаша:гезгмашо
гектар:гектар[a_epent]
генерал:генерал[a_epent]
гений:гений
геолог:геолог[a_epent]
герб:герб[a_epent]
гергарло:гергарлон[a_epent]
герз:герз[a_epent]
герка:геркан[a_epent]
герма:герман[a_epent]
герой:герой
гиба:гибан[a_epent]
гибрид:гибрид[a_epent]
гижу:гижун[a_epent]
гийзаг:гийзаг[a_epent]
гила:гилан[a_epent]
гилдиг:гилдиг[a_epent]
гильза:гильзан[a_epent]
гимн:гимн[a_epent]
гимнаст:гимнаст[a_epent]
гимнастка:гимнастк[a_epent]
гинсу:гинсун[a_epent]
гипербола:гипербол[a_epent]
гипнотизeр:гипнотизeр[a_epent]
гипотеза:гипотез[a_epent]
гипотенуза:гипотенуз[a_epent]
гипс:гипс[a_epent]
гирда:гирдан[a_epent]
гирз:гирз[a_epent]
гитара:гитар[a_epent]
гитарист:гитарист[a_epent]
гитаристка:гитаристк[a_epent]
гиччо:гиччо
глагол:глагол[a_epent]
глобус:глобус[a_epent]
говзанча:говзанч[a_epent]
говр:говр[a_epent]
гонорар:гонорар[a_epent]
горгали:горгале
горгам:горгам[a_epent]
горком:горком[a_epent]
горн:горн[a_epent]
горнист:горнист[a_epent]
горняк:горняк[a_epent]
городок:городок[a_epent]
госпиталь:госпиталь
гостиница:гостиниц[a_epent]
готовальни:готовальне
гочдархо:гочдархо[fourth_type]
градус:градус[a_epent]
градусник:градусник[a_epent]
гражданин:граждан[a_epent]
гражданка:гражданк[a_epent]
грамм:грамм[a_epent]
грамматика:грамматик[a_epent]
граммофон:граммофон[a_epent]
грамота:грамот[a_epent]
граната:гранат[a_epent]
гранит:гранит[a_epent]
графа:граф[a_epent]
график:график[a_epent]
графин:графин[a_epent]
грейдер:грейдер[a_epent]
грек:грек[a_epent]
грелка:грелкан[a_epent]
гречанка:гречанк[a_epent]
грузовик:грузовик[a_epent]
группа:группан[a_epent]
гу:ран[a_epent]
гудок:гудок[a_epent]
